lexc/adj/enhuadjsok.lexc
! enhuadj1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [stem]  +Adj @U.ART.PRESENT@ 

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter  +Mid
+Ik
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §OEOE11§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §oeoezmid§ §OEOE4a§ §oeoez1oe§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoebb§ §oeoez11§ §ooez13§
§oeoez12§ §oeoez5§ §oeoez4§ §oeoez31§ §OEOE4§ §OEOE3§ §ooez4§ §EOA1§
§oeoez21§ §oooe2§ §oeoez24§ §AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§
§ooez23§ §uue2§ §EOA22§ §OEOE21§ §AE21§ §UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ §AE22§
§OEOE22§ §oeoez4a§ §ooez4a§ §oeoez5a§ §oeoez15§ 
§oeoez17§ §nAE§ §nAEmely§ §OEOE17§ §oeoez34§
§oeoeadjoe§ §oeoez11e§ 


LEXICON Root
   Prefleg ;

! al only with these
LEXICON AddAdjto
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocaseto;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!

LEXICON AddAdjbov
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocasebov;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!

LEXICON AddAdjbova
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocasebova;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!

LEXICON AddAdjbovaois
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocasebovaois;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!

Lexicon Tocase
[stem]+Adj:0     Poss;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plur;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik


LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;

LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig


Lexicon Tocasekicsi
[stem]+Adj:0     Posskicsi;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurkicsi;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famkicsi;

LEXICON Posskicsi
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Famkicsi;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Famkicsi;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Famkicsi;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famkicsi;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Famkicsi;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famkicsi;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^j§nAE§im   Famkicsi;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famkicsi;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^j§nAE§id   Famkicsi;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famkicsi;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^j§nAE§i   Famkicsi;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famkicsi;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^j§nAE§ink   Famkicsi;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famkicsi;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^j§nAE§it§OEOE2§k   Famkicsi;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famkicsi;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^j§nAE§ik   Famkicsi;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

LEXICON Plurkicsi
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genkicsi;
                            Genkicsi;
LEXICON Famkicsi
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genkicsi;
                       Genkicsi;
LEXICON Genkicsi
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casekicsi;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casekicsi;
                       Casekicsi;

LEXICON Casekicsi
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig


Lexicon Tocasebov
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possbov;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurbov;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Fambov;

LEXICON Possbov
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez4§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA1§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4§m   Fambov;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4§d   Fambov;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Fambov;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fambov;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4§t§OEOE3§k   Fambov;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fambov;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fambov;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fambov;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fambov;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fambov;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fambov;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fambov;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fambov;

LEXICON Plurbov
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez5§k    Genbov;
                            Genbov1;
LEXICON Fambov
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genbov;
                       Genbov1;
LEXICON Genbov
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casebov;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casebov;
                       Casebov;
LEXICON Genbov1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casebov;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casebov;
                       Casebov1;

LEXICON Adj
angyalszép:angyalsze AddAdjto;
buborékkönnyű:buborékkönny AddAdjbov;
bő:bőv AddAdjbov;
csigalassú AddAdjbova;
csigalassú:csigalassa AddAdjbova;
csodaszép:csodasze AddAdjto;
csudakönnyű:csudakönny AddAdjbov;
csudaszép:csudasze AddAdjto;
farkönnyű:farkönny AddAdjbov;
faroknehéz:faroknehez AddAdjbov;
fejnehéz:fejnehez AddAdjbov;
fodorkönnyű:fodorkönny AddAdjbov;
fuvallatkönnyű:fuvallatkönny AddAdjbov;
félnehéz:félnehez AddAdjbov;
gyakori:gyakra AddAdjbova;
gyönyörűszép:gyönyörűsze AddAdjto;
habkönnyű:habkönny AddAdjbov;
hamukönnyű:hamukönny AddAdjbov;
harmatkönnyű:harmatkönny AddAdjbov;
hosszú:hossza AddAdjbova;
ideálszép:ideálsze AddAdjto;
ifjú:ifja AddAdjbova;
jó:jo AddAdjbovaois;
kevés:keves AddAdjbov;
kicsi:kis AddAdjto;
könnyű:könny AddAdjbov;
középnehéz:középnehez AddAdjbov;
lassú AddAdjbova;
lassú:lassa AddAdjbova;
leheletkönnyű:leheletkönny AddAdjbov;
lepkekönnyű:lepkekönny AddAdjbov;
lufikönnyű:lufikönny AddAdjbov;
madárkönnyű:madárkönny AddAdjbov;
meseszép:mesesze AddAdjto;
nehéz:nehez AddAdjbov;
pehelykönnyű:pehelykönny AddAdjbov;
pihekönnyű:pihekönny AddAdjbov;
pillangókönnyű:pillangókönny AddAdjbov;
párakönnyű:párakönny AddAdjbov;
remekszép:remeksze AddAdjto;
savbő:savbőv AddAdjbov;
sok:tö AddAdjto;
szellőkönnyű:szellőkönny AddAdjbov;
szuperkönnyű:szuperkönny AddAdjbov;
szupernehéz:szupernehez AddAdjbov;
szuperszép:szupersze AddAdjto;
százszorszép:százszorsze AddAdjto;
szép:sze AddAdjto;
szóbő:szóbőv AddAdjbov;
szörnyű AddAdjbov;
szörnyű:szörny AddAdjbov;
tejszínhabkönnyű:tejszínhabkönny AddAdjbov;
tengersok:tengertö AddAdjto;
tollkönnyű:tollkönny AddAdjbov;
tollpihekönnyű:tollpihekönny AddAdjbov;
tündérszép:tündérsze AddAdjto;
világszép:világsze AddAdjto;
vérbő:vérbőv AddAdjbov;
vízbő:vízbőv AddAdjbov;
vízkönnyű:vízkönny AddAdjbov;
álomszép:álomsze AddAdjto;
ízbő:ízbőv AddAdjbov;
ólomnehéz:ólomnehez AddAdjbov;
örökszép:öröksze AddAdjto;
